Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 3. Finances

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 579 to 671; 63A Am. Jur. 2d Public Funds § 1 et seq.

64 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1118, 1119; 64A C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1621 to 1885.

§§ 15-3-301 through 15-3-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to presentation and payment of claims, see §

15-1-125

.

As to present provision relating to the collection of city or town monies, see §

15-1-126

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 184 to 189, 191, related to finances.

§ 15-3-306.
Financial statements to be published.

The governing body shall cause to be published a semiannual interim financial statement and an annual statement of the financial condition of the city.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 190; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-190; W.S. 1977, § 15-3-307; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 2.